Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26.2 Distributed Generation Standard Contracts

39-26.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as “The Distributed Generation Standard Contracts Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1.

39-26.2-2.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate and promote installation of grid-connected generation of renewable energy; support and encourage development of distributed renewable energy generation systems; reduce environmental impacts; reduce carbon emissions that contribute to climate change by encouraging the local siting of renewable energy projects; diversify the state’s energy generation sources; stimulate economic development; improve distribution system resilience and reliability; and reduce distribution system costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1.

39-26.2-3.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Annual target” means the target for total renewable energy nameplate capacity of new distributed-generation standard contracts set out in §

39-26.2-4

.

“Board” shall mean the distributed generation standard contract board established pursuant to the provisions of §

39-26.2-10

, or the office of energy resources. Until such time as the board is duly constituted, the office of energy resources shall serve as the board with the same powers and duties pursuant to this chapter.

“Commission” means the Rhode Island public utilities commission.

“Distributed-generation contract capacity” means ten percent (10%) of an electric distribution company’s minimum long-term contract capacity under the long-term contracting standard for renewable energy in §

39-26.1-3

, inclusive of solar capacity. The distributed-generation contract capacity shall be reserved for acquisition by the electric distribution company through standard contracts pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“Distributed-generation facility” means an electrical-generation facility that is a newly developed renewable energy resource as defined in §

39-26.1-2

, located in the electric distribution company’s load zone with a nameplate capacity no greater than five megawatts (5 MW), using eligible renewable energy resources as defined by §

39-26-5

, including biogas created as a result of anaerobic digestion, but, specifically excluding all other listed eligible biomass fuels, and connected to an electrical power system owned, controlled, or operated by the electric distribution company.

“Distributed-generation project” means a distinct installation of a distributed-generation facility. An installation will be considered distinct if it is installed in a different geographical location and at a different time, or if it involves a different type of renewable energy class.

“Electric distribution company” means a company defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, supplying standard-offer service, last-resort service, or any successor service to end-use customers, but not including the Block Island Power Company or the Pascoag Utility District.

“Large distributed-generation project” means a distributed-generation project that has a nameplate capacity that exceeds the size of a small distributed-generation project in a given year, but is no greater than three megawatts (3 MW) nameplate capacity.

“Office” means the Rhode Island office of energy resources.

“Program year” means a calendar year beginning January 1 and ending December 31.

“Renewable energy classes” means categories for different renewable energy technologies using eligible renewable energy resources as defined by §

39-26-5

. For each program year, the board shall determine the renewable energy classes as are reasonably feasible for use in meeting distributed-generation objectives from renewable energy resources and are consistent with the goal of meeting the annual target for the program year. For the program year ending December 31, 2012, there shall be at least four (4) technology classes and at least two (2) shall be for solar-generation technology, and at least one shall be for wind. The board may add, eliminate, or adjust renewable energy classes for each program year with public notice given at least sixty (60) days previous to any renewable energy class change becoming effective. For each program year, the board shall set renewable energy class targets for each class established. Class targets are the total program-year target amounts of nameplate capacity reserved for standard contracts for each renewable energy class. The sum of all the class targets shall equal the annual target.

“Renewable energy credit” means a New England Generation Information System renewable energy certificate as defined in §

39-26-2(14)

;

“Small distributed-generation project” means a distributed-generation, renewable energy project that has a nameplate capacity within the following: Solar: fifty kilowatts (50 KW) to five hundred kilowatts (500 KW); Wind: fifty kilowatts (50 KW) to one and one-half megawatts (1.5 MW). For technologies other than solar and wind, the board shall set the nameplate capacity size limits, but such limits may not exceed one megawatt. The board may lower the nameplate capacity from year to year for any of these categories, but may not increase the capacity beyond what is specified in this definition. In no case may a project developer be allowed to segment a distributed-generation project into smaller-sized projects in order to fall under this definition.

“Standard contract” means a contract with a term of fifteen (15) years at a fixed rate for the purchase of all capacity, energy, and attributes generated by a distributed-generation facility. A contract may have a different term if it is mutually agreed to by the seller and the electric distribution company and it is approved by the commission. The terms of the standard contract for each program year and for each renewable energy class shall be set pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“Standard contract ceiling price” means the standard contract price for the output of a distributed-generation facility which price is approved annually for each renewable energy class pursuant to the procedure established in this chapter, for the purchase of energy, capacity, renewable energy certificates, and all other environmental attributes and market products that are available or may become available from the distributed-generation facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 202, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 18.

39-26.2-4.
Standard contracts — Annual targets.

To the extent eligible projects are available and submit conforming applications, an electric distribution company shall enter into standard contracts for an aggregate nameplate capacity of at least forty megawatts (40 MW) of distributed-generation projects by the end of 2014, unless such schedule is extended by the board. The contracting shall be spread over four (4) years, based on the annual targets, aggregated to reflect annual targets from prior program years, contained in the following four-year (4) phased schedule, unless such schedule is adjusted by the board in any given year:

By December 30, 2011: a minimum of five megawatts (5 MW) nameplate;

By December 30, 2012: a minimum aggregate of twenty megawatts (20 MW) nameplate;

By December 30, 2013: a minimum aggregate of thirty megawatts (30 MW) nameplate;

By December 30, 2014: a minimum aggregate of forty megawatts (40 MW) nameplate.

By October 15, 2011, and each calendar year following until October 15, 2013, the board may recommend to the commission that the annual target for the following program year be adjusted upward to reflect any shortfalls in meeting the previous program year’s annual target or to reflect any standard contracts entered into during prior program years that are voided. The board may also recommend to the commission that the annual target for the following program year be adjusted downward by any amounts that the previous program year’s annual targets were exceeded by the standard contracts entered into during that program year.

The board may, based on market data and other information available to it including pricing for standard contracts received during previous program years, recommend a reduction of the annual target for the upcoming program year where the board determines that market conditions would be likely to produce unfavorably high target pricing for standard contracts during that upcoming program year. In considering such issues, the board may take into account the reasonableness of current pricing and its impact on all electric distribution customers who will be paying for the output for up to twenty (20) years at such prices. The board may recommend and the commission shall authorize an extension of time to achieve the forty megawatt (40 MW) targets, to allow for contracting to occur after 2014, if necessary.

The electric distribution company must contract for at least forty megawatts (40 MW) of nameplate capacity distributed-generation projects by the end of 2014, unless such schedule is extended by the board. The electric distribution company may not be required to contract for more than forty megawatts (40 MW) or the distributed-generation contract capacity, but may do so voluntarily, subject to commission approval.

Each year, the board shall file its recommendations relating to the schedule, along with its report and recommendations regarding ceiling prices, for the commission’s review and approval as specified in §

39-26.2-5(b)

.

Nothing in this chapter shall derogate from the statutory authority of the commission or the division, including, but not limited to, the authority to protect ratepayers from unreasonable rates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 202, § 2.

39-26.2-5.
Standard contract ceiling price.

Within a period of time sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section, but not longer than ninety (90) days after the effective date of this chapter, the board shall set ceiling prices and annual targets for each renewable energy class of distributed generation for the 2011 program year and make a filing with the commission pursuant to this chapter recommending such prices and targets. Thereafter annually, by no later than October 15 of each year, the board shall make filings with the commission to recommend the standard contract ceiling prices and annual targets for each renewable energy class of distributed-generation facility. The ceiling price for each technology should be a price that would allow a private owner to invest in a given project at a reasonable rate of return, based on recent reported and forecast information on the cost of capital, and the cost of generation equipment. The calculation of the reasonable rate of return for a project shall include where applicable any state or federal incentives including, but not limited to, tax incentives. In setting the ceiling prices, the board also may consider: (1) Transactions for newly developed renewable energy resources, by technology and size, in the ISO-NE region and the northeast corridor; (2) Pricing for standard contracts received during the previous program year; (3) Environmental benefits, including, but not limited to, reducing carbon emissions, and system benefits; and (4) Cost-effectiveness. The board shall, in performing this assessment, involve representation from its advisory council, if applicable, and from the office of energy resources, the electric distribution company, and the energy efficiency and resources management council. The board shall hold, with at least ten (10) business days’ notice, a public community review meeting. The board shall issue a report of its findings from the assessment process recommending standard contract ceiling prices for the upcoming program year. Such report shall be filed with the commission, along with a recommendation for the approval of the ceiling prices for the program year.

The commission shall open a docket to consider for approval ceiling prices proposed by the board. In reviewing the recommended ceiling prices, the commission shall give due consideration to the recommendations and report of the board and the standards set forth in subsection (a). The commission shall issue a decision within sixty (60) days after the recommendations and report are filed with the commission establishing the ceiling prices to be used by electric distribution companies in standard contracts applicable to each renewable energy class in order to effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

During any program year, the board may, on its own initiative, elect to revisit the ceiling prices if the board determines that the prices are either too low or too high. In that case, it may make a filing with the commission to seek a modification to the program for that year, which shall be acted upon by the commission within sixty (60) days. While the request is pending, the electric distribution company may suspend executing standard contracts until a decision is reached on the request.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1.

39-26.2-6.
Standard contract enrollment program.

Each electric distribution company shall conduct at least three (3) standard contract enrollments during each program year; however, during 2011, the electric distribution company need only conduct one enrollment. Each enrollment shall be open for a two-week (2) period during which the electric distribution company is required to receive standard short-form applications requesting standard contracts for distributed-generation energy projects. The short-form applications shall require the applicant to provide the project owner’s identity and the project’s proposed location, nameplate capacity, and renewable energy class and allow for additional information relative to the permitting, financial feasibility, ability to build, and timing for deployment of the proposed projects. For small distributed-generation projects, the applicant must submit an affidavit confirming that the project is not a segment of a larger project being planned for enlargement over time. For large distributed-generation projects, the short-form application shall also require the applicant to bid a bundled price for the sale of the energy, capacity, renewable energy certificates, and all other environmental attributes and market products that are available or may become available from the distributed-generation facility, on a per-kilowatt-hour basis for the output of the project. Subject to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c), the electric distribution company shall not be required to enter into standard contracts in excess of the annual target for the applicable program year and shall not be required to enter into standard contracts in excess of any limit set by the board and approved by the commission for a given enrollment. However, the electric distribution company may voluntarily exceed an enrollment period limit as long as it does not exceed an annual target for the applicable program year.

For small distributed-generation projects, the electric distribution company shall select projects for standard contracts based on the lowest proposal prices received with any distributed-generation project that meets the requirements of all applicable tariffs and regulations, and meets the criteria of a renewable energy class in effect, until the class target is met. Enrollment periods will be governed by a solicitation and enrollment process rules that shall be filed with the commission each October 15 by the electric distribution company, and approved by the commission within sixty (60) days of such filing.

For large distributed-generation projects, the electric distribution company shall select projects for standard contracts based on the lowest proposed prices received, but not to exceed the applicable standard contract ceiling price, provided, that the selected projects meet the requirements of all applicable tariffs and regulations and meet the criteria of a renewable energy class in effect until the class target is met. Except for 2011, no enrollment period shall seek to enroll more than one-third (1/3) of the annual goal for the distribution company for large distributed-generation projects.

If there are more projects than what is specified for a class target at the same price, the electric distribution company shall review the applications submitted and select first those projects that appear to be the furthest along in development and likely to be deployed in consultation with the office. Those projects that are likely to be deployed on the earliest timelines shall be selected. To the extent the electric distribution company is unable to make a clear distinction on this basis, the electric company shall report the results to the board and not enter into contracts with those projects that are tied on pricing. In such case, the board may take such action as it deems appropriate for the selection of projects, including seeking more information from the projects. Alternatively, the board may consider adjustments to the ceiling price and a rebid, or simply wait until the next enrollment.

Should an electric distribution company determine that it has entered into sufficient standard contracts to achieve a program-year class target, it shall immediately report this to the board, the office of energy resources, and the commission, and cease entering into standard contracts for that renewable energy class for the remainder of the program year. An electric distribution company may exceed the renewable energy class target if the last standard contract entered into may cause the total purchased to exceed the target. The office and the electric distribution company shall enter into a memorandum of understanding regarding the sharing of the information and data related to the distributed-generation program.

The electric distribution company is authorized to enter into standard contracts up to the applicable ceiling price. As long as the terms of the standard contract are materially the same as the standard contract terms approved by the commission and the pricing is no higher than the applicable ceiling price, the contracts shall be deemed prudent and approved by the commission for purposes of recovering the costs in rates.

A distributed-generation project that also is being employed by a customer for net-metering purposes may submit an application to sell the excess output from its distributed-generation project. In such case, however, at the election of the self-generator, all of the renewable energy certificates and environmental attributes pertaining to the energy consumed on site may be sold to the electric distribution company on a month-to-month basis outside of the terms of the standard contract. In such case, the portion of the renewable energy certificates that pertains to the energy consumed on site during the net-metering billing period shall be priced at the average market price of renewable energy certificates, which may be determined by using the price of renewable energy certificates purchased or sold by the electric distribution company.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 202, § 2.

39-26.2-7.
Standard contract — Form and provisions.

The following process shall be implemented to establish the non-price terms and conditions of the standard contract:

A working group (“contract working group”) shall be established and supervised by the board, consisting of the following members: (i) The director of the office of energy resources; (ii) A designee from the division of public utilities and carriers; (iii) Two (2) designees of the electric distribution company; (iv) Two (2) individuals designated by the office of energy resources who are experienced developers of renewable-generation projects; (v) One individual designated by the office of energy resources who represents a customer of the electric distribution company; and (vi) A lawyer designated by the office of energy resources who has at least three (3) years of experience in negotiating and/or developing power-purchase agreements. With respect to the lawyer designated in (vi), the electric distribution company shall enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement with the lawyer, to compensate the lawyer for the time spent serving in the contract working group at the reasonable hourly rate negotiated by the office of energy resources. The costs incurred by the electric distribution company under the reimbursement agreement shall be recovered in rates by the electric distribution company in the year incurred or the year following incurrence through an appropriate filing with the commission. The contract working group shall be an advisory group that is not to be considered to be an agency for purposes of the administrative procedures act or any other laws pertaining to public bodies.

The contract working group shall work in good faith to develop standard contracts that would be applicable for various technologies for both small and large distributed-generation projects. The standard contracts should balance the need for the project to obtain financing against the need for the distribution company to protect itself and its distribution customers against unreasonable risks. The standard contract should be developed from contracting terms typically utilized in the wholesale power industry, taking into account the size of each project and the technology. The standard contracts shall provide for the purchase of energy, capacity, renewable energy certificates, and all other environmental attributes and market products that are available, or may become available from the distributed-generation facility. However, the electric distribution company shall retain the right to separate out pricing for each market product under the contracts for administrative and accounting purposes to avoid any detrimental accounting effects or for administrative convenience, provided that such accounting, as specified in the contract, does not affect the price and financial benefits to the seller as a seller of a bundled product. The standard contract also shall:

Hold the distributed-generation facility owner liable for the cost of interconnection from the electric-distribution facility to the interconnect point with the distribution system, and for any upgrades to the existing electric-distribution system that may be required by the electric distribution company. However, a distributed-generation facility owner may appeal to the commission to reduce any required system upgrade costs to the extent such upgrades can be shown to benefit other customers of the electric distribution company and the balance of such costs shall be included in rates by the electric distribution company for recovery in the year incurred or the year following incurrence;

Require the distributed-generation facility owner to make a performance guarantee deposit to the electric distribution company of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for small distributed-generation projects or twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for large distributed-generation projects for every renewable energy certificate estimated to be generated per year under the contract, but at least five hundred dollars ($500), and not more than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), paid at the time of contract execution;

Require the electric distribution company to refund the performance-guarantee deposit on a pro-rated basis of renewable energy credits actually delivered by the distributed-generation facility over the course of the first year of the project’s operation, paid quarterly;

Provide that if the distributed-generation facility has not generated ninety percent (90%) of the output proposed in its enrollment application within eighteen (18) months after execution of the contract, the contract shall be terminated and the performance guarantee shall be forfeited. An eligible, small-scale, hydropower-distributed-generation facility that has not generated ninety percent (90%) of the output proposed in its enrollment application within forty-eight (48) months after execution of the contract shall result in the contract being terminated and the performance guarantee being forfeited. An eligible anaerobic-digestion-distributed-generation facility that has not generated ninety percent (90%) of the output proposed in its enrollment application within thirty-six (36) months after execution of the contract shall result in the contract being terminated and the performance guarantee being forfeited. Any forfeited performance-guarantee deposits shall be credited to all distribution customers in rates and not retained by the electric distribution company;

Provide for flexible payment schedules that may be negotiated between the buyer and seller, but shall be no longer than quarterly if an agreement cannot be reached;

Require that an electric meter that conforms with standard industry norms be installed to measure the electrical energy output of the distributed-generation facility, and require a system or procedure by which the distributed-generation facility owner shall demonstrate creation of renewable energy credits, in a manner recognized and accounted for by the GIS; such demonstration of renewable energy credit creation to be at the distributed-generation facility owner’s expense. The electric distribution company may, at its discretion, offer to provide such a renewable energy credit measurement and accounting system or procedure to the distributed-generation facility owner, and the distributed-generation facility owner may, at its discretion, use the electric distribution company’s program, or use that of an independent third party, approved by the commission, and the costs of the measurement and accounting are paid for by the distributed-generation facility owner.

All distributed-generation projects that have executed contracts will be required to submit quarterly reports on the progress of the project to the distribution company and the office of energy resources. Failure to submit these quarterly progress reports may result in the termination of the contract.

If the contract working group reaches agreement on the terms of standard contracts, the board shall file the contracts with the commission for approval. If there are any disagreements, they shall be identified to the commission. The commission shall review the standard contracts for conformance with the standards set forth in subsection (2). Should there be any disputes, the commission shall issue an order resolving them. To the extent the commission needs expert assistance to resolve any disagreements noted in the filing, the commission is authorized to hire a consultant to assist it in the proceedings, the costs of which shall be recovered from electric distribution customers pursuant to a uniform factor established by the commission in rates for recovery by the electric distribution company in the year incurred or the year following incurrence, as requested through a filing by the electric distribution company. The commission shall issue an order approving standard forms of contract within sixty (60) days of the filing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 202, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 200, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 216, § 4.

39-26.2-8.
Standard contract — Reporting.

After each enrollment during a program year, the electric distribution companies shall provide a report to the board, office of energy resources, and the commission of the aggregate amount of project nameplate capacity that was the subject of standard contracts entered into during that enrollment and the prices under each of the standard contracts that were executed.

Each quarter of a program year, the electric distribution company shall provide an accounting to the office of energy resources, the board, and the commission of the total amount paid to distributed-generation facilities under standard contracts during that quarter, until the forty megawatt (40 MW) target is met.

Until the forty megawatt (40 MW) target is met, the electric distribution company shall submit preliminary reports to the office of energy resources, the board, and the commission indicating the number of standard contracts and total estimated annual generation, price, class, and any other relevant information for the purposes of better specifying classes, targets, or standard contract prices so as to achieve the purposes set forth in this chapter. These reports shall be submitted no later than sixty (60) days prior to the end of the calendar year.

The electric distribution company shall in consultation with the office utilize uniform standard forms for evaluating project proposals and shall rank projects according to uniform criteria.

At the end of each enrollment, the electric distribution company shall, upon request by an applicant, provide the applicant with written feedback on the evaluation of the applicant’s project proposal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 202, § 2.

39-26.2-9.
Interaction with other statutory provisions.

Except as expressly differentiated in this chapter, standard contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be treated for all purposes as long-term contracts entered into under the provisions of the long-term contracting standards for renewable energy found in chapter 26.1 of this title, and all such provisions shall apply to such contracts.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1.

39-26.2-10.
Establishment of board — Purposes.

There is hereby authorized, created, and established a board to be known as “The Distributed Generation Standard Contract Board” with the powers and duties set forth in this chapter.

The purposes of this board are to:

Evaluate and make recommendations to the commission regarding ceiling prices and annual contracting targets, the make-up of renewable energy classes, and the terms of standard contracts under the provisions of this chapter;

Provide consistent, comprehensive, informed, and publicly accountable involvement by representatives of groups impacted by, involved in, and knowledgeable regarding the development of distributed-generation projects that are eligible to enter into standard contracts; and

Monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of the distributed-generation standard contracting program for the purchase of the energy output of distributed renewable-generation projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1.

39-26.2-11.
Composition and appointment.

The board shall consist of ten (10) members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate; seven (7) members shall be voting members, and the governor shall give due consideration to appointing persons with knowledge of: (1) Energy regulation and law; (2) Large commercial/industrial users; (3) Small commercial/industrial users; (4) Residential users; (5) Low-income users; (6) Environmental issues pertaining to energy; and (7) Construction of renewable generation. Three (3) members shall be ex officio, nonvoting members, one representing an electric distribution company, one representing the commissioner of the office of energy resources, and one representing the commerce corporation. From the seven (7) voting members, the governor shall appoint one person to be chairperson of the board and one person to be vice chairperson of the board; the commissioner of the office of energy resources shall be the executive secretary and executive director of the board.

With the exception of the representative of the commissioner of the office of energy resources, and the representative of the commerce corporation, the initial appointment of the other ex officio, nonvoting member shall be for a term of two (2) years, to be thereafter reappointed or replaced by a nonvoting member with terms of two (2) years. Of the initial appointments of voting members, three (3) voting members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years, to be thereafter reappointed or replaced by three (3) voting members with a term of two (2) years, and four (4) voting members shall be appointed for a term of one year, to be thereafter reappointed or replaced for each of the following three (3) years by four (4) voting members with a term of one year.

A simple majority of the total number of voting members shall constitute a quorum.

A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term. The appointing authority shall have the power to remove its appointee only for just cause.

The members of the board shall not be compensated for their service but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the executive secretary/executive director.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 18.

39-26.2-12.
Powers and duties.

The board shall have the power to:

Develop and recommend to the public utilities commission, for review and approval, ceiling prices for standard contracts under the distributed-generation standard contracts;

Develop and recommend to the commission adjustments up or down to the annual target for standard contracts for the following program year;

Monitor and evaluate performance under the distributed-generation standard contracts act, including an assessment of ratepayer impact and the project selection process, to be submitted annually in a report to the governor and the general assembly as provided in subsection (b);

Participate in proceedings of the public utilities commission that pertain to the purposes of the board;

In order to provide funding for the purposes of engaging consultants and professional services as necessary and appropriate for the board to fulfill its duties and purposes, an allocation of no less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from unused portions of Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative (“RGGI”) auction proceeds not dedicated to efficiency measures but to overhead expenses shall be transmitted from the office of energy resources to the board.

On January 15 of each year, the office of energy resources shall submit to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives, an annual jobs, economic impact, and environmental impact study on the distributed-generation standard contracts program. The study shall include, but not be limited to, environmental benefits, including carbon emission reductions from the installations; economic impacts including, but not limited to, direct and indirect jobs created; system reliability improvements; property and income tax benefits; and ratepayer impacts including, but not limited to, hedges against general inflation and fuel price volatility, short-term price impacts, and wholesale price suppression.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 202, § 2.

39-26.2-13.
Liberal construction of chapter required.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1.

39-26.2-14.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 143, § 1.